Maryland, session 2025, SB1033.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 9–1E–01(e) through (g) and (k) and 9–1E–10 of Article – State Government
of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 9–1E–01(h)
through (j) and (l) through (p) and 9–1E–11 through 9–1E–17 of Article – State Government
of the Annotated Code of Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 9–1E–01(e) through (l)
and 9–1E–10 through 9–1E–16, respectively.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
11–818.
(e) The Commission may waive all or any portion of the review that it determines
to be appropriate for any applicant that is:
(3) a sports wagering [facility] licensee under Title 9, Subtitle 1E of the
State Government Article.
Article – State Government
9–1E–04.
(b) In accordance with this subtitle, the Commission shall adopt regulations that
establish:
(1) subject to [§ 9–1E–15] § 9–1E–14 of this subtitle, the form and content
of an application for any license required under this subtitle;
9–1E–05.
(a) The following persons shall be licensed under this subtitle:
(1) a person that operates sports wagering;

SENATE BILL 1033 3
(2) a person that operates sports wagering on behalf of a sports wagering
licensee[, including an online sports wagering operator];
(3) a person not licensed under item (1) or (2) of this subsection that
manages, operates, supplies, provides security for, or provides service, maintenance, or
repairs for sports wagering equipment and devices; and
(4) an individual directly employed in the operation of sports wagering by
a sports wagering licensee if the individual does not otherwise hold a valid license under
Subtitle 1A of this title.
(c) (2) Except as provided under this subtitle or in regulation, the Commission
may not waive a requirement under paragraph (1) of this subsection that relates to:
(ii) a requirement of the Sports Wagering Application Review
Commission under [§ 9–1E–15] § 9–1E–14 of this subtitle.
(d) (3) Except as provided under this subtitle or in regulation, the Commission
may not grant an exemption or a waiver of a licensing requirement adopted by the Sports
Wagering Application Review Commission in accordance with [§ 9–1E–15(h)(2)] §
9–1E–14(H)(2) of this subtitle to implement remedial measures based on the findings of
a study of the sports wagering industry and market.
9–1E–06.
(a) (1) On an award of a license by the Sports Wagering Application Review
Commission established under [§ 9–1E–15] § 9–1E–14 of this subtitle, the Commission
shall:
(i) issue a Class A–1 sports wagering [facility] license to an
applicant that meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle who is:
1. a video lottery operator with more than 1,000 video lottery
terminals; or
2. A. the owner, or the designee of the owner, of a
stadium in Prince George’s County that is primarily used for professional football (NFL);
B. the owner, or the designee of the owner, of a professional
football (NFL) franchise that is a lessee of a stadium in Baltimore City;
C. the owner, or the designee of the owner, of a professional
major league baseball franchise that is a lessee of a stadium in Baltimore City;

SENATE BILL 1033
D. the owner, or the designee of the owner, of a professional
hockey league (NHL) franchise, that is a lessee of a stadium in the State;
E. the owner, or the designee of the owner, of a professional
basketball association (NBA) franchise, that is a lessee of a stadium in the State; or
F. the owner, or the designee of the owner, of a professional
soccer league (MLS) franchise, that is a lessee of a stadium in the State;
(ii) issue a Class A–2 sports wagering [facility] license to an
applicant that meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle who is:
1. a video lottery operator with 1,000 or fewer video lottery
terminals; or
2. a horse racing licensee;
(iii) subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, issue a Class
B–1 sports wagering [facility] license to any applicant who meets the requirements for
licensure under this subtitle and who is not eligible for a Class B–2 sports wagering
[facility] license; AND
(iv) subject to paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, issue a Class
B–2 sports wagering [facility] license to any applicant who is a person with less than:
1. 25 full–time equivalent employees; or
2. $3,000,000 in annual gross receipts[; and
(v) issue not more than 60 mobile sports wagering licenses to any
applicant who meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle].
(2) (i) The Commission shall issue a Class B–1 or Class B–2 sports
wagering [facility] license to an applicant that meets the requirements for licensure under
this subtitle who is:
1. the holder of a license issued by the State Racing
Commission under § 11–524 of the Business Regulation Article, including a subsidiary of
the license holder;
2. a person who is the owner or lessee of a facility approved
for satellite simulcast betting before January 1, 2021, unless the satellite simulcast facility
is located at a video lottery facility or a racetrack; and

SENATE BILL 1033 5
3. a person who holds a commercial bingo license, if the
facility at which the person operates commercial bingo was permitted to operate at least
200 electronic bingo machines or electronic tip jar machines on January 1, 2021.
(ii) In addition to the Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering [facility]
licenses issued in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the Commission may
issue not more than 30 Class B–1 and Class B–2 sports wagering [facility] licenses under
paragraph (1) of this subsection.
(3) (i) The Sports Wagering Application Review Commission
established under [§ 9–1E–15] § 9–1E–14 of this subtitle may not award a Class B–1 or
B–2 sports wagering [facility] license to an applicant:
1. who is eligible to apply for a Class A–1 or A–2 sports
wagering [facility] license under paragraph (1) of this subsection;
2. who holds a Class A–1 or A–2 sports wagering [facility]
license; or
3. whose sports wagering facility will be located:
A. except as provided under subparagraph (ii) of this
paragraph, within a 15–mile radius of a Class A–1 or A–2 sports wagering facility located
in Allegany County, Cecil County, or Worcester County;
B. with respect to an application for a sports wagering
[facility] license submitted before June 1, 2025, within a 15–mile radius of a Class B–1 or
B–2 sports wagering facility licensed to a person described under paragraph (2)(i) of this
subsection and located in Charles County;
C. with respect to an application for a sports wagering
[facility] license submitted before June 1, 2025, within a 10–mile radius of a Class B–1 or
B–2 sports wagering facility licensed to a person described under paragraph (2)(i) of this
subsection and located in Carroll County;
D. with respect to an application for a sports wagering
[facility] license submitted before June 1, 2025, within a 5–mile radius of a Class B–1 or
B–2 sports wagering facility licensed to a person described under paragraph (2)(i) of this
subsection and located in Frederick County; or
E. within a 1.5–mile radius of a Class A–1 or A–2 sports
wagering facility located in a county not described under item A, B, C, or D of this item or
any other Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering facility.

SENATE BILL 1033
(ii) 1. The prohibition under subparagraph (i)3A of this
paragraph does not apply in Allegany County prior to the issuance of a Class A–1 or A–2
sports wagering [facility] license in Allegany County.
2. A Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering [facility] license
issued within a 15–mile radius of a Class A–1 or A–2 sports wagering facility in Allegany
County may be renewed if the license was initially issued prior to the issuance of the Class
A–1 or A–2 license.
(4) A for–profit entity, nonprofit organization, or public–private
partnership operating at the racing location described under Title 11, Subtitle 7 of the
Business Regulation Article located on lands owned by the Department of Natural
Resources may apply for a Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering [facility] license.
(5) If an applicant designates an entity to hold the license under paragraph
(1)(i)2 of this subsection, the designee shall be considered the applicant and subject to the
requirements of the application process.
[(6) In addition to any other person, an applicant for or holder of a Class
A–1, A–2, B–1, or B–2 sports wagering facility license may apply for a mobile sports
wagering license under this subsection.]
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, an applicant for
a sports wagering license shall pay to the Commission an application fee of:
(i) $2,000,000 for a Class A–1 sports wagering [facility] license;
(ii) $1,000,000 for a Class A–2 sports wagering [facility] license;
(iii) $250,000 for a Class B–1 sports wagering [facility] license; AND
(iv) $50,000 for a Class B–2 sports wagering [facility] license[; and
(v) $500,000 for a mobile sports wagering license].
(2) The requirement to pay an application fee to the Commission under
paragraph (1) of this subsection does not apply to an applicant for a Class A–2 sports
wagering [facility] license that is a horse racing licensee described under § 11–510(b)(3) of
the Business Regulation Article.
(c) (3) The license renewal fee is equal to 1% of the licensee’s average annual
proceeds from sports wagering for the preceding 3–year period less any proceeds remitted
by the licensee in accordance with [§ 9–1E–12] § 9–1E–11 of this subtitle.
9–1E–07.

SENATE BILL 1033 7
(a) An applicant for a license under this subtitle shall submit to the Commission:
(2) if the applicant is applying for a sports wagering license, an affidavit
attesting to:
(v) any other information considered necessary by the Commission
or the Sports Wagering Application Review Commission established under [§ 9–1E–15] §
9–1E–14 of this subtitle.
(c) (1) This subsection does not apply to the application or license renewal fees
for a sports wagering license required under § 9–1E–06 of this subtitle.
(2) [(i) Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, the] THE
Commission shall adopt regulations that establish an application fee and license renewal
fee for a license under this subtitle.
[(ii) The application fee for an online sports wagering operator license
may not be less than $5,000.]
(3) An applicant shall submit the application fee with the application.
(4) The term of the license is 5 years.
(d) On a properly approved transmittal prepared by the Commission, the
Comptroller shall pay the following amounts from the application fees and license renewal
fees collected by the Commission under this section and § 9–1E–06 of this subtitle:
(2) 5% of the fees collected for each Class A–1 and A–2 sports wagering
[facility] license to the Small, Minority–Owned, and Women–Owned Business Sports
Wagering Assistance Fund established under [§ 9–1E–16] § 9–1E–15 of this subtitle; and
(i) (1) The holder of a Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering [facility] license [or
a mobile sports wagering license] may only sell or transfer ownership of the license if the
licensee was actively engaged in operating sports wagering in the State for at least 3 years
immediately preceding the sale or transfer of the ownership of the license.
(2) Nothing in paragraph (1) of this subsection may be construed to limit
the ability of the Commission to enforce this subtitle.
9–1E–09.
(a) A sports wagering [facility] licensee may accept wagers on sporting events
that are made:
(1) by an individual physically present:

SENATE BILL 1033
(i) at a video lottery facility, if the sports wagering licensee is a video
lottery operator;
(ii) at Pimlico Race Course or a race track located at Laurel Park, if
the sports wagering licensee is a horse racing licensee;
(iii) subject to subsection [(d)] (B) of this section, at a stadium
primarily used for professional football (NFL), professional major league baseball,
professional hockey (NHL), professional basketball (NBA), or professional soccer (MLS), if
the sports wagering licensee is the owner or a lessee or the designee of the owner or lessee
of the stadium;
(iv) at the Maryland State Fairgrounds in Timonium, if the sports
wagering licensee is the holder of a license issued by the State Racing Commission under §
11–524 of the Business Regulation Article, or a subsidiary of the license holder;
(v) at a satellite simulcast facility, if the sports wagering licensee is
the owner or lessee of a satellite simulcast facility described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2) of this
subtitle;
(vi) at a commercial bingo facility with at least 200 electronic bingo
machines or electronic tip jar machines, if the sports wagering licensee is a commercial
bingo operator described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2) of this subtitle; or
(vii) subject to subsection [(e)] (C) of this section, at the facility
identified in the application approved by the Sports Wagering Application Review
Commission, if the sports wagering licensee is a holder of a Class B–1 or B–2 sports
wagering [facility] license; or
(2) on a self–service kiosk, device, or machine, approved by the
Commission, located in a facility or at a location identified under item (1) of this subsection.
(b) [A mobile sports wagering licensee may accept wagers on sporting events that
are made through online sports wagering by an individual physically located in the State.
(c) To participate in online sports wagering under this section, an individual shall
register:
(1) in person at a facility or location identified under subsection (a)(1) of
this section; or
(2) online using a website or mobile application approved by the
Commission.
(d)] (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, a sports wagering [facility]
licensee may contract with any other sports wagering [facility] licensee to provide sports

SENATE BILL 1033 9
wagering services on behalf of the licensee at a location where the licensee is authorized to
accept wagers on sporting events.
(2) If a sports wagering licensee authorized to accept wagers at a stadium
under subsection (a)(1)(iii) of this section contracts with a video lottery operator, or an
affiliate or a subsidiary of that video lottery operator, to provide sports wagering services
at the stadium, the licensee may contract only with a video lottery operator, or an affiliate
or a subsidiary of that video lottery operator, that operates a video lottery facility located
in the same county as the stadium.
[(e)] (C) A sports wagering [facility] licensee authorized to accept in–person
wagers at the racing location described under Title 11, Subtitle 7 of the Business Regulation
Article located on lands owned by the Department of Natural Resources may only accept
wagers in the special event zone.
9–1E–10.
(a) An individual may not wager on a sporting event and a sports wagering
licensee may not accept a wager from an individual on a sporting event if the individual:
(1) is under the age of 21 years;
(2) is not physically present in the State;
(3) is an athlete, a coach, a referee, or a director or an employee of a sports
governing entity or any of its member teams;
(4) is the direct or indirect legal or beneficial owner of 10% or more of a
sports governing entity or any of its member teams if any member team of that sports
governing entity participates in the sporting event;
(5) has access to certain types of exclusive information on any sporting
event overseen by that individual’s sports governing entity;
(6) holds a position of authority or influence sufficient to exert influence
over the participants in a sporting event, including coaches, managers, handlers, or athletic
trainers;
(7) is identified on a mandatory or voluntary sports wagering exclusion list
maintained by the Commission;
(8) is the operator, director, officer, owner, or employee of the sports
wagering licensee [or online sports wagering operator] or any relative of the licensee [or
operator] living in the same household as the licensee [or operator];
(9) has access to nonpublic confidential information held by the sports
wagering licensee [or online sports wagering operator]; or

SENATE BILL 1033
(10) is a category of individuals prohibited by the Commission under
subsection [(e)] (D) of this section from wagering on a sporting event.
(b) [For online sports wagering, a mobile sports wagering licensee shall:
(1) have in place technical and operational measures to prevent access by
individuals who are underage or physically located outside the State, including:
(i) age verification procedures, which may require the use of a
reputable independent third party that is in the business of verifying an individual’s
personally identifiable information; and
(ii) the use of geolocation technology to verify a bettor’s geographic
location;
(2) include on its online sports wagering website a description of the
possible repercussions for an underage or out–of–state bettor, which may include
immediate stoppage of play, account closure, and forfeiture and confiscation of winnings;
and
(3) establish procedures to prevent prohibited individuals from wagering
on sporting events.
(c)] A sports wagering licensee shall:
(1) promptly report to the Commission:
(i) any criminal or disciplinary proceedings against the licensee or
its employees in connection with the licensee’s sports wagering operation;
(ii) any abnormal betting activity or patterns that may indicate a
concern about the integrity of a sporting event;
(iii) any other conduct with the potential to corrupt the outcome of a
sporting event for purposes of financial gain, including match fixing; and
(iv) any suspicious or illegal wagering activities, including the use of
funds derived from illegal activity, wagers to conceal or launder funds derived from illegal
activity, use of agents to place wagers, or use of false identification; and
(2) maintain records of sports wagering operations in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Commission.
[(d)] (C) The Commission is authorized to share any information under this
section with any law enforcement agency, sports team, sports governing entity, or
regulatory agency the Commission deems appropriate.

SENATE BILL 1033 11
[(e)] (D) (1) In this subsection, “interested party” means:
(i) a sports wagering licensee;
(ii) a professional sports team, league, association, or governing
entity; or
(iii) an institution of higher education.
(2) If an interested party believes that a type or form of wagering or a
category of individuals wagering on sporting events is contrary to public policy, is unfair to
consumers, or affects the integrity of a particular sport or the sports wagering industry, the
interested party may submit to the Commission, in writing, a request to prohibit the type
or form of sports wagering or the category of individuals from wagering on sporting events.
(3) After conducting a public hearing on a request submitted under
paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Commission may grant the request on a showing of
good cause by the interested party.
(4) The Commission shall respond to a request under this subsection
concerning a particular sporting event before the start of the sporting event to the greatest
extent feasible, or as soon as practicable.
9–1E–11.
(b) (1) (i) Except as provided in [subparagraphs] SUBPARAGRAPH (ii)[,
(iii), and (iv)] of this paragraph, all proceeds from sports wagering shall be electronically
transferred monthly into the State Lottery Fund established under Subtitle 1 of this title.
(ii) [A Class A–1 and A–2 sports wagering facility licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the locations described in §
9–1E–09(a) of this subtitle.
(iii)] A [Class B–1 and B–2] sports wagering [facility] licensee shall
retain 85% of the proceeds from sports wagering conducted at the location described in the
licensee’s application.
[(iv) A mobile sports wagering licensee shall retain 85% of the
proceeds from online sports wagering received by the licensee.]
(2) All proceeds from sports wagering in the State Lottery Fund
established under Subtitle 1 of this title shall be distributed on a monthly basis, on a
properly approved transmittal prepared by the Commission to the Blueprint for Maryland’s
Future Fund established under § 5–206 of the Education Article.

SENATE BILL 1033
9–1E–13.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, on or before December 1,
2025, the Commission shall report to the General Assembly, in accordance with § 2–1257
of [the State Government Article] THIS ARTICLE, on the racial, ethnic, gender, and
geographic diversity of holders of Class B–1 and B–2 sports wagering [facility] licenses
[and mobile sports wagering licenses] under this subtitle, the level of market saturation of
sports wagering in the State, and whether the number of Class B–1 and B–2 sports
wagering [facility] licenses [and mobile sports wagering licenses] that may be issued under
this subtitle should be increased in order to address the demand for sports wagering in the
State.
(2) Before the Commission submits the report described under paragraph
(1) of this subsection, the Commission shall provide the Legislative Policy Committee with
at least 30 days to submit comments to the Commission.
9–1E–14.
(f) The Sports Wagering Application Review Commission:
(1) shall review applications for sports wagering licenses submitted in
accordance with § 9–1E–06 of this subtitle;
(2) shall award:
(i) a Class A–1 or A–2 [facility] SPORTS WAGERING license to any
applicant that meets the requirements for licensure under this subtitle; and
(ii) a Class B–1 or B–2 [facility] SPORTS WAGERING license to any
applicant that is described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2)(i) of this subtitle and meets the
requirements for licensure under this subtitle; and
(3) may not award a Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering [facility] license,
other than to an applicant described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2)(i) of this subtitle, [or a mobile
sports wagering license] until after the Sports Wagering Application Review Commission
adopts the regulations required under subsection (h) of this section.
(h) (1) This subsection applies only to Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering
[facility] licenses, other than licenses issued to an applicant described under §
9–1E–06(a)(2)(i) of this subtitle[, and mobile sports wagering licenses].
(2) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, the Sports Wagering
Application Review Commission shall adopt regulations governing the evaluation of
applications for Class B–1 or B–2 sports wagering [facility] licenses, other than licenses
issued to an applicant described under § 9–1E–06(a)(2)(i) of this subtitle, [and mobile sports
wagering licenses] submitted in accordance with § 9–1E–06 of this subtitle.

SENATE BILL 1033 13
(3) The Sports Wagering Application Review Commission, in consultation
with the certification agency as defined in § 14–301 of the State Finance and Procurement
Article, the Governor’s Office of Small, Minority, and Women Business Affairs, and the
Office of the Attorney General, shall:
(i) evaluate a study of the sports wagering industry and market to
determine whether there is a compelling interest to implement remedial measures, in
addition to the application of the State Minority Business Enterprise Program under Title
14, Subtitle 3 of the State Finance and Procurement Article or a similar program, to assist
minorities and women in the sports wagering industry;
(ii) evaluate race–neutral programs or other methods that may be
used to address the needs of minorities, women, and minority and women–owned
businesses seeking to participate in the sports wagering industry, including through the
ownership of entities licensed to conduct sports wagering under this subtitle;
(iii) consider whether an applicant for a Class B–1 or B–2 sports
wagering [facility] license intends to conduct sports wagering at a facility located in an
opportunity zone or an enterprise zone; AND
(iv) [consider allowing early access to the mobile sports wagering
market to entities with a meaningful partnership with minorities, women, and
minority– and women–owned businesses; and
(v)] adopt emergency regulations to implement remedial measures,
if necessary and to the extent permitted by State and federal law, based on the findings of
the study evaluated under item (i) of this paragraph.
(4) The Sports Wagering Application Review Commission shall:
(i) to the extent permitted by federal and State law, actively seek to
achieve racial, ethnic, and gender diversity when awarding licenses; and
(ii) encourage applicants who qualify as a minority business
enterprise, as defined in § 14–301 of the State Finance and Procurement Article, or who
are small, minority, or women–owned business entities to apply for sports wagering
licenses under this subtitle.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding §
9–1E–06(d)(2) of the State Government Article, the State Lottery and Gaming Control
Commission shall refund the application fee submitted in accordance with §
9–1E–06(b)(1)(v) of the State Government Article by:
(1) an applicant for a mobile sports wagering license whose application is
still pending on or after July 1, 2025, if the applicant rescinds the application; and

SENATE BILL 1033
(2) the holder of a mobile sports wagering license, if the licensee surrenders
the license before accepting any sports wagers under that license.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Sections 1, 2, and 3 of this
Act shall take effect January 1, 2026.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025.